Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 29.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1245
Educational Service
Unit Coordinating Council; created; composition; funding; powers.

(1) The Educational Service
Unit Coordinating Council is created as of July 1, 2008. On such date the
assets and liabilities of the Distance Education Council shall be transferred
to the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council. The council shall be
composed of one administrator from each educational service unit. The council
shall be funded from two percent of the core services
and technology infrastructure funding appropriated pursuant to section 79-1241.03,
appropriations by the Legislature for distance education, and fees established
for services provided to educational entities.

(2) The council
is a political subdivision and a public body corporate and politic of this
state, exercising public powers separate from the participating educational
service units. The council shall have the duties, privileges, immunities,
rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a political subdivision and a public
body corporate and politic but shall not have taxing power.

(3) The council shall
have power (a) to sue and be sued, (b) to have a seal and alter the same at
will or to dispense with the necessity thereof, (c) to make and execute contracts
and other instruments, (d) to receive, hold, and use money and real and personal
property, (e) to hire and compensate employees, including certificated employees,
(f) to act as a fiscal agent for statewide initiatives being implemented by
employees of one or more educational service units, and (g) from time to time,
to make, amend, and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations not inconsistent
with sections 79-1245 to 79-1249. Such power shall only be used as necessary
or convenient to carry out and effectuate the powers and purposes of the council.

Laws 2007, LB603, § 16;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 29.